South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4687.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 15, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-15-150. (A) In order to improve the safety of the state highway system, each county sheriff shall submit to the Department of Transportation a quarterly report identifying road segments within the county that deputies have observed as unsafe, deteriorating, or hazardous to the traveling public. (B) Each road identified shall be classified into one of the following categories: (1) Immediate Work Needed-a roadway or segment that presents an urgent danger to life or property and requires the department's inspection and corrective action within thirty days. (2) Potentially Hazardous Road-a roadway or segment that shows conditions which may become dangerous if not addressed and must be incorporated into preservation and maintenance planning. (3) Currently Dangerous-Closure Recommended-a roadway or segment that is unsafe for travel under normal conditions, requiring immediate review and possible closure until repairs are completed. (C) Anytime a county sheriff determines that a roadway or street presents a danger so severe that it may need to be closed, that roadway must be reported to the department immediately. (D) The department must evaluate the reported roadway within twenty-four hours of receiving a sheriff's report. The department shall respond to the sheriff with either: (1) confirmation that the roadway will be closed until further repairs are completed; or (2) justification for keeping the roadway open, along with an immediate action plan to address the safety concerns. (E) The department shall: (1) maintain a centralized database of all quarterly sheriff's reports; (2) incorporate the information received into the department's project prioritization and scoring system; (3) respond in writing to each sheriff's report within forty-five days, outlining actions taken or planned; and (4) publish a quarterly summary available to the public listing the roads identified, their classification, and the department's response. (F) Each county submitting a timely quarterly report shall receive a reimbursement of five hundred dollars from the department for administrative costs associated with compiling and transmitting the report. All reimbursements shall be paid from the department's existing budget. No new taxes, fees, or appropriations are required for this program. (G) If the department fails to respond within the forty-five-day period contained in subsection (E), notification shall be sent automatically to the Governor and to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Transportation. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----